Maine, session 132, LD1495.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §405, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and 8,
is repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13001-A, sub-§10-A is enacted to read:
10-A. Professional Standards Board. "Professional Standards Board" means the
Professional Standards Board established in section 13101.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13003, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and 8, is
amended to read:
4. Rules. The state board Professional Standards Board may adopt rules to carry out
this section.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §13006-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §5 and
affected by §41, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §13006-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Professional Standards Board; authority. Except as otherwise provided, the
Professional Standards Board has authority to adopt rules to implement this chapter,
chapter 502 and chapter 502‑A. Rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board to
implement this chapter and chapter 502 are major substantive rules, as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A, except that the following rules are routine technical rules:
A. Rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board to implement section 13032;
and
B. Rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board to implement section 13011,
subsection 8.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §13006-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §5 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
2. Commissioner authority. Notwithstanding subsection 1 1-A, the commissioner
has authority to adopt rules:
A. To determine the qualifications and process for issuing clearance credentials under
chapter 502. These rules are routine technical rules, as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A; and
B. Governing the collection and handling of records and information regarding the
experiences, qualifications and character of persons seeking credentials under this
chapter and chapter 502. These rules are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §13007, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 235, §6 and
affected by §41, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The department shall annually post at the beginning of the fiscal year the fees established
by the commissioner for the initial issuance of and the renewal of a credential on its publicly
accessible website. A fee established pursuant to this subsection may not increase by more
than 10% of the previous fiscal year's fee, unless the increase is approved by the state board
Professional Standards Board.
Page 1 - 132LR1803(01)

Sec. 8. 20-A MRSA §13008, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 635, Pt. B, §1, is
amended to read:
3. Report. The department shall annually report the data collected under this section
to the Governor, the state board Professional Standards Board and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters.
Sec. 9. 20-A MRSA §13011, as amended by PL 2017, c. 235, §9 and affected by
§41, is further amended to read:
§13011. General authorization of state board Professional Standards Board
1. Credentialing and revocation rules. The state board Professional Standards Board
shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter under which the commissioner
shall:
A. Issue certificates to teachers, administrators, educational specialists, educational
technicians and other professional personnel for service in a public school or in an
approved private school, except that certification is not required for a person holding a
valid license as a speech-language pathologist under Title 32, section 17301 who has
received a clearance pursuant to section 13024 to provide speech-language pathology
services in a public school or approved private school;
B. Issue certificates to adult education teachers and other teaching and professional
personnel in publicly supported educational programs other than postsecondary school
institutions, colleges and universities;
D. Seek a revocation of a credential in the District Court;
E. Issue certificates to personnel who provide early childhood educational programs
or developmental therapy to children from birth to 5 years of age in the home, in
community-based special purpose and integrated programs and in public schools; and
F. Issue a clearance to all individuals for whom certification is not required prior to
being hired or being placed under contract by a public school or a private school that
enrolls 60% or more publicly funded students.
2. Moral character. Rules adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board
under this chapter must require that an applicant for certification furnish evidence of:
A. Good moral character.
3. Teacher certificates. The state board rules Rules adopted by the Professional
Standards Board must establish qualifications for certifying teachers in accordance with
sections 13012‑A and 13013.
4. Appeal. An applicant who has been denied the issuance or renewal of a credential
by the commissioner under this chapter may appeal that denial in accordance with rules
established by the state board Professional Standards Board and consistent with the
provisions of the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, Title 5, chapter 375.
5. Administrator certificates. The state board rules Rules adopted by the
Professional Standards Board must establish qualifications for certifying administrators in
accordance with sections 13012‑A and 13019‑I to be superintendents of schools, building
administrators or principals and for such other administrators as may be determined to be
necessary and beneficial for the efficient operation of the schools.
Page 2 - 132LR1803(01)

6-A. Educational specialist certificates. The state board Professional Standards
Board shall establish qualifications for certifying educational specialists in accordance with
sections 13012‑A, 13019‑G and 13022 and for other educational specialists as may be
determined to be necessary and beneficial for the efficient operation of the schools.
6-B. Educational technician certificates. The state board Professional Standards
Board shall establish qualifications for certifying educational technicians in accordance
with section 13019‑H and for other educational technicians as may be determined to be
necessary and beneficial for the efficient operation of the schools.
7. Certification waiver. Under rules adopted by the state board Professional
Standards Board, the commissioner may grant a waiver for an appropriate period of time
to an individual seeking the issuance or renewal of a certificate. The commissioner may
grant a waiver to an individual who:
A. Receives allegedly inaccurate, incomplete or untimely information or action from
the department or from a local or regional support system. The waiver must be for a
reasonable period of time to permit the applicant to complete certification
requirements; or
B. Demonstrates compliance with certification requirements by professional
alternative methods, including the following:
(1) Scores on Graduate Record Examinations demonstrating content area
proficiency equal to approved course work, with passing scores established under
rules adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board;
(2) Examinations accepted by state-approved programs in lieu of course work,
with passing scores established under rules adopted by the state board Professional
Standards Board;
(3) Examinations from professional testing corporations demonstrating content
area proficiency equal to approved course work, with professional testing
corporations approved by the state board and passing scores established under rules
adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board; and
(4) Work experience equivalent to outcomes for approved course work and a
formal recommendation from the state professional organization in that content
area. The professional organizations are established under rules adopted by the
state board Professional Standards Board. The waiver is for the duration of the
certificate or endorsement sought.
The commissioner may not grant a waiver to an individual who is seeking an endorsement
for special education.
8. Criminal history record checks. Criminal history record checks of an applicant
for a credential, including renewals, must be conducted in accordance with this section, and
section 6103 and pursuant to rules adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board.
Sec. 10. 20-A MRSA §13013, as amended by PL 2023, c. 442, §1, is further
amended to read:
§13013. Professional teacher certificate
Page 3 - 132LR1803(01)

1. Definition. A professional teacher certificate is a renewable certificate issued to an
individual who has met the qualifications of this section.
2-B. Qualifications. State board rules Rules adopted by the Professional Standards
Board governing the qualifications for a professional teacher certificate must require that
the certificate may be issued only to an applicant who, at a minimum, meets one of the
following criteria:
A. Has graduated from an educator preparation program;
B. Has met the criteria established by the state board Professional Standards Board by:
(1) Passing a qualifying examination;
(2) Meeting grade point average requirements in required course work; or
(3) Successful completion of a portfolio review demonstrating competency
through academic or work experience;
C. Has successfully completed a preparation program in another state, the District of
Columbia, a United States territory or another country, subject to the completion of an
approved preparation program for the endorsement or certificate being sought with a
formal recommendation for certification from the institution that provided the program;
or
D. Is otherwise qualified by having met the criteria established by the state board
Professional Standards Board for teaching in a specified content area.
3. Endorsements. A professional teacher certificate must be issued with an
endorsement that specifies the grades and subject area that the teacher is determined
qualified to teach. A holder of a professional teacher certificate may not teach outside the
certificate holder's area of endorsement unless the certificate holder has received a waiver
from the commissioner in accordance with state board rules rules adopted by the
Professional Standards Board.
4. Five-year certificate. A professional teacher certificate is issued for a 5-year
period.
5. Renewal. A professional teacher certificate may be renewed for 5-year periods in
accordance with state board rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board, which must
require, at a minimum, that the teacher, whether employed or unemployed, complete at
least 6 semester hours of professional or academic study or in-service training designed to
improve the performance of the teacher in the field. If the teacher has attained certification
from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards, the renewal period is for 10
years. If a rule adopted pursuant to section 13006‑A amends the endorsement specifications
for grades or subject areas for a teacher's professional teacher certificate, the teacher may
renew the teacher's professional teacher certificate with the same grades and subject areas
endorsements as were issued with the active professional teacher certificate that is held by
the teacher at the time of the amendment.
6. Reissuance; retired teacher. The commissioner may issue a professional teacher
certificate to a person who is receiving a retirement benefit from the State Employee and
Teacher Retirement Program established under Title 5, section 17602 and who was
employed for at least 10 years by a public school, who has been receiving a retirement
benefit for no more than 5 years and who, immediately prior to receiving that benefit,
Page 4 - 132LR1803(01)

414 possessed an active professional teacher certificate in good standing that has subsequently
425 lapsed. The professional teacher certificate must be issued with the same grades and
436 subject areas endorsements as were issued with the active professional teacher certificate
447 that was held by the teacher at the time of the teacher's retirement. A professional teacher
458 certificate issued under this subsection is for the same period as specified in subsection 4
469 and subject to the same renewal standards as specified in subsection 5. State board rules
570 Rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board may further govern qualifications for a
581 professional teacher certificate issued under this subsection.
Sec. 11. 20-A MRSA §13019-G, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §25 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
2. Qualifications. The state board Professional Standards Board shall adopt rules
establishing the qualifications for an educational specialist certificate.
Sec. 12. 20-A MRSA §13019-G, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §25 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
4. Certificate renewal. An educational specialist's certificate is issued for a 5-year
period and may be renewed in accordance with state board rules adopted by the
Professional Standards Board, which must require, at a minimum, that the educational
specialist, whether employed or unemployed, complete at least 6 semester hours of
professional or academic study or the equivalent or in-service training designed to improve
the performance of the educational specialist in the field.
Sec. 13. 20-A MRSA §13019-H, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §25 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
2. Qualifications. The state board Professional Standards Board shall adopt rules
establishing the qualifications and supervision for an educational technician certificate.
Sec. 14. 20-A MRSA §13019-H, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §25 and
affected by §41, is amended to read:
3. Certificate renewal. An educational technician certificate is issued for a 5-year
period and may be renewed in accordance with state board rules adopted by the
Professional Standards Board, which must require, at a minimum, that the educational
technician, whether employed or unemployed, complete at least 3 semester hours of
professional or academic study or the equivalent or in-service training designed to improve
the performance of the educational technician in the field.
Sec. 15. 20-A MRSA §13019-H, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 442, §2 and
reallocated by RR 2023, c. 1, Pt. A, §7, is amended to read:
6. Reissuance; retired educational technician. The commissioner may issue an
educational technician certificate to a person who has been receiving a retirement benefit
from the State Employee and Teacher Retirement Program established under Title 5,
section 17602 for no more than 5 years and who, immediately prior to receiving that
benefit, possessed an active educational technician certificate in good standing that has
subsequently lapsed. An educational technician certificate issued under this subsection is
for the same period and subject to the same renewal standards as specified in subsection 3.
State board rules Rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board may further govern
qualifications for an educational technician certificate issued under this subsection.
Page 5 - 132LR1803(01)

Sec. 16. 20-A MRSA §13019-I, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 235, §25 and affected
by §41, is amended to read:
§13019-I. Administrator certificate
1. Requirement. An administrator's certificate is required for employment as an
administrator at a school administrative unit in the State, at a public school or at a private
school approved for attendance purposes pursuant to section 2901, subsection 2, paragraph
B.
2. Qualifications. State board rules Rules adopted by the Professional Standards
Board governing the qualifications for an administrator certificate must require that the
certificate may be issued only to an applicant who at a minimum:
A. Has at least 3 years of satisfactory teaching experience or the equivalent;
B. Has academic and professional knowledge as demonstrated through the completion
of required graduate or undergraduate courses or programs, performance in
examinations or completion of specialized programs approved for this purpose;
C. Has a basic level of knowledge in competency areas determined by the state board
Professional Standards Board; and
D. Has satisfactorily completed an approved internship or practicum relating to the
duties of an administrator.
3. Certificate renewal. An administrator's certificate is issued for a 5-year period and
may be renewed in accordance with state board rules adopted by the Professional Standards
Board, which must require, at a minimum, that the administrator, whether employed or
unemployed, complete at least 6 semester hours of professional or academic study or the
equivalent or in-service training designed to improve the performance of the administrator
in the field.
4. Endorsements. The administrator certificate must be issued with an endorsement
that specifies the work area for which the individual is determined to be qualified. A holder
of an administrator certificate may not work outside the holder's area of endorsement unless
permitted under rules established by the state board Professional Standards Board. This
includes the following areas:
A. Employment as a superintendent of a school administrative unit in the State;
B. Employment as a building administrator or principal of a public school or as chief
administrator of a private school approved for attendance purposes pursuant to section
2901, subsection 2, paragraph B; and
C. Employment as any other administrator as may be determined by the state board
Professional Standards Board to be necessary and beneficial for the efficient operation
of the schools.
Sec. 17. 20-A MRSA §13020, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 845, §4 and
amended by PL 1999, c. 547, Pt. B, §78 and affected by §80, is further amended to read:
1. General. The state board's rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board under
this chapter shall must specify the procedure to be followed by the commissioner in seeking
the revocation or suspension of a certificate in the District Court and shall must authorize
Page 6 - 132LR1803(01)

412 the commissioner to enter into a consent agreement with any certificated person in lieu of
423 initiating or completing a proceeding in the District Court.
Sec. 18. 20-A MRSA §13020, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 845, §4, is
amended to read:
B. Other grounds as may be established by the state board Professional Standards
Board in its rules relating to criminal offenses not inconsistent with Title 5, chapter
341, fraud or gross incompetence.
Sec. 19. 20-A MRSA §13020, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 845, §4, is
amended to read:
4. Reinstatement of certificate. Revoked certificates may only be reinstated only in
accordance with state board rules adopted by the Professional Standards Board. The
following provisions govern the reinstatement of any certificate revoked for reasons of
child abuse or exploitation.
A. Notwithstanding Title 5, chapter 341, no a certificate revoked for reasons of child
abuse or exploitation may not be reinstated within 5 years of the revocation and in no
case may not be reinstated less than 3 years from the expiration of probation or parole
or discharge from imprisonment for a criminal conviction involving child abuse or
exploitation.
B. In determining whether a certificate may be reinstated, the commissioner shall
determine whether the applicant has been sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant the
public trust. The applicant shall be required to must demonstrate sufficient evidence of
rehabilitation, notwithstanding Title 5, chapter 341, and the commissioner shall state
in writing the basis for any decision which that denies reinstatement of a certificate.
C. Denial of reinstatement pursuant to paragraph B may be appealed to the Superior
Court.
Sec. 20. 20-A MRSA §13022, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2011, c. 386, §2, is
further amended to read:
2. Certification by commissioner. The commissioner shall certify school
psychologists pursuant to rules adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board.
The rules must include practice standards for certified school psychologists that follow
national standards set forth by the National Association of School Psychologists or a
successor organization and ethics standards set forth by the National Association of School
Psychologists or a successor organization and the American Psychological Association or
a successor organization, violation of which constitutes grounds for suspension or
revocation of the certification.
Sec. 21. 20-A MRSA §13022, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 228, §7, is
further amended to read:
3. Qualifications. State board rules Rules adopted by the Professional Standards
Board governing the qualifications for a school psychologist certificate must require that a
certificate be issued only to an applicant who has met the academic and preprofessional
requirements established by the state board Professional Standards Board for the provision
of school psychological services and who, at a minimum:
Page 7 - 132LR1803(01)

A. Holds a graduate degree from an accredited program in school psychology that was
approved by the National Association of School Psychologists, the American
Psychological Association in School Psychology or the department at the time the
degree was awarded;
B. Has completed graduate work that is determined by the commissioner to be
substantially similar to the programs referred to in paragraph A; or
C. Holds a valid license from the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists with
demonstrated competency in the area of school psychology through training and
experience.
Sec. 22. 20-A MRSA §13022, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 228, §8, is
further amended to read:
4. Term of issuance. The commissioner shall issue a school psychologist certificate
for a term of years consistent with rules adopted by the state board Professional Standards
Board. The school psychologist certificate may be renewed in accordance with academic
and professional requirements established by the state board Professional Standards Board.
A certificate holder must be supervised for the first year following initial certification at no
additional cost to the school administrative unit or the department. Supervision of the first-
year school psychologist must be in accordance with supervision standards established by
the National Association of School Psychologists or a successor organization and provided
by a person who is certified as a school psychologist.
Sec. 23. 20-A MRSA §13022, sub-§7, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 386, §2, is
further amended to read:
A. The duties of the committee are:
(1) To advise the state board Professional Standards Board in the adoption of rules
and a code of ethics and practice standards for school psychologists; and
(2) To assist the commissioner in:
(i) Certifying school psychologists;
(ii) Investigating alleged violations of the code of ethics and practice standards
adopted by the state board Professional Standards Board; and
(iii) Investigating alleged violations of section 13020 and certification rules
governing school psychologists.
Sec. 24. 20-A MRSA §13025, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 477, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Subpoenas. When conducting an investigation relating to the credentialing of
personnel under chapter 501 and this chapter and rules of the state board Professional
Standards Board, the commissioner may issue subpoenas for education records relevant to
that investigation.
Sec. 25. 20-A MRSA §13026, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 426, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Notification of noncompliance. Upon receipt of a list from a school administrative
unit pursuant to subsection 1, the department shall determine for each person included on
Page 8 - 132LR1803(01)

412 the list whether the person has complied with all applicable criminal history record check
423 and fingerprinting requirements of section 6103 and rules adopted by the state board
434 Professional Standards Board. If the department determines that the person has failed to
445 comply with any such applicable requirement, the department shall immediately notify the
456 school administrative unit of the person's failure to comply.
Sec. 26. 20-A MRSA §13101, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 457, Pt. GG, §1,
is amended to read:
1. Board established. There is established the Professional Standards Board, referred
to in this chapter as "the board," to establish certification standards and advise the state
board regarding professional growth, certification, endorsement, authorization and
governance of the education profession in this State. The board consists of the following
22 members, 3 of whom must hold national board certification, and 2 ex officio members:
A. Two elementary school teachers;
B. Two middle school teachers;
C. Two high school teachers;
D. Two educational specialists;
E. Two special education teachers;
F. Two education technicians;
G. Three building administrators, one from an elementary school, one from a middle
school and one from a high school;
H. One special education director;
I. One curriculum coordinator;
J. Two district-level administrators;
K. Two faculty members teaching in an approved teacher preparation program;
L. One member of the public;
M. One member, ex officio, of the state board; and
N. The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, serving as an ex officio,
nonvoting member of the board.
The board shall consider the commissioner's or the designee's recommendations.
A member whose employment status changes during that member's term on the board
remains on the board for the duration of the term for which that member was appointed.
Sec. 27. 20-A MRSA §13101, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2005, c. 683, Pt. E, §1,
is further amended to read:
2. Appointments. The Governor shall appoint the 23 members of the board specified
in subsection 1, paragraphs A to M from nominations submitted by the education
profession and interested persons. Members representing practitioner groups must be
active practitioners and are appointed from a list of nominees presented by the largest
organization in the State representing education paraprofessionals, elementary and
secondary teachers, university faculty and each administrator specialty. Appointments of
Page 9 - 132LR1803(01)

410 members by the Governor under subsection 1, paragraphs A to M made after July 1, 2026
421 must be submitted to the Legislature by the Governor and are subject to review by the joint
432 standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters and to
443 confirmation by the Legislature. A member who is appointed may serve in the member's
454 position from the date of appointment unless the Legislature rejects the confirmation.
Sec. 28. 20-A MRSA §13101, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 457, Pt. GG, §1,
is amended to read:
4. Compensation. The appointed members of the board serve without are entitled to
compensation and are entitled to reimbursement by the state board for mileage and
expenses incurred in performing required duties. The state board shall furnish the board
with materials, secretarial assistance and meeting facilities chair is entitled to an additional
stipend.
Sec. 29. 20-A MRSA §13101, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 457, Pt. GG, §1,
is amended to read:
6. Powers and duties. The board has the following powers and duties.
A. The board shall make recommendations to the state board, including, but not limited
to, preservice education, continuing education, professional growth, initial
certification, recertification and paraprofessional training and certification, and shall
advise the department on rule-making procedures.
A-1. The board shall establish standards for the certification of teachers.
B. The board shall monitor the impact of the policies adopted pursuant to paragraph A
A-1 on the education profession in making recommendations and reports to the
commissioner and the state board.
C. In making policy recommendations on the certification process, the board shall
consider complaints received by the department regarding the certification or
certification approval process.
D. The board shall meet 5 times annually.
E. The board shall maintain records and minutes of its meetings and shall file them in
the certification office within the department.
Sec. 30. 20-A MRSA §13101, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Staff assistance. The department shall provide staff assistance to assist the board
in carrying out its functions. The department shall additionally furnish the board with
materials, secretarial assistance and meeting facilities.
Sec. 31. 20-A MRSA §13103, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 457, Pt. GG, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 32. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.